District of Columbia statutes.
42-2705.04

Agency to arrange annual audit; transmission to Mayor and Council.

The Agency shall contract at least once each year with an independent certified public accountant to audit the books and accounts of the Agency. The Agency shall transmit the audit to the Mayor and Council within 10 days of receipt.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-135, § 504, 25 DCR 5008
1981 Ed., § 45-2154.
1973 Ed., § 45-1930.